Vermont, session 2025-2026, H436.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS AND PURPOSE
(a) Findings. The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Housing insecurity disproportionately impacts women in the
criminal justice system, resulting in inequitable detention outcomes.
(2) Women nearing the end of their criminal sentences or detained
pretrial lack consistent access to appropriate low-security settings, impeding
successful reentry and exacerbating equity concerns.
(3) Current practices, such as reward-based housing classifications,
create barriers to equitable access to low-security or reentry-focused facilities.
(4) The Chittenden Regional Correctional Facility was not designed to
meet the diverse security and reentry needs of incarcerated women.
(b) Purpose. The purpose of this act is to:
(1) ensure all incarcerated women are housed at the least restrictive
security level appropriate to their risk and needs;
(2) establish a statutory framework for reentry-specific facilities that
prioritize rehabilitation, equity, and community reintegration;
(3) address inequities in pretrial detention related to housing insecurity;
and
(4) minimize barriers to reentry by reforming incarceration classification
and housing policies.
VT LEG #380894 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.436
2025 Page 3 of 12
Sec. 2. 28 V.S.A. § 3 is amended to read:
§ 3. GENERAL DEFINITIONS
As used in this title:
* * *
(3) “Correctional facility” or “facility” means any building, enclosure,
space, or structure of or supported by the Department and used for the
confinement of persons committed to the custody of the Commissioner, or for
any other matter related to such confinement, except a reentry facility.
* * *
(13) “Least restrictive security level” means placing persons in the
custody of the Commissioner at a facility based on a validated risk assessment
that prioritizes public safety and individual needs while minimizing
unnecessary security restrictions.
(14) “Reentry facility” has the same meaning as described in section 602
of this title.
Sec. 3. 28 V.S.A. § 602 is added to read:
§ 602. REENTRY FACILITIES
(a) Creation and design.
(1) The Department shall establish a reentry facility at any appropriate
location in the State to provide the least restrictive security level for persons
VT LEG #380894 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.436
2025 Page 4 of 12
transitioning back into the community following release from a correctional
facility.
(2) Reentry facilities shall be designed to:
(A) serve offenders within five years after release from a correctional
facility;
(B) be accessible to inmates awaiting trial who do not pose a
significant risk of flight or public safety concerns in accordance with 13 V.S.A.
§ 7554; and
(C) provide inmate and offender transitional services, including
family support, housing assistance, mental health care, career and vocational
training, and other necessities of life in accordance with 33 V.S.A. chapter 21.
(b) Assessment and placement. The placement of persons at a reentry
facility shall be based upon an evidence-based risk and needs assessment of
eligible persons under the custody of the Commissioner.
(1) Inmates committed to the custody of the Commissioner shall be
assessed for placement in a reentry facility pursuant to section 701b of this
title.
(2) Inmates placed in a correctional facility shall be reassessed every 90
days for placement in a reentry facility.
(3) Within 90 days before release from a correctional facility, the
Department shall assess any offender for placement in a reentry facility.
VT LEG #380894 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.436
2025 Page 5 of 12
(c) Victim notification. The Department shall develop procedures to
ensure any alleged or known victims are informed when a person is placed in a
reentry facility. Notification procedures shall be established in collaboration
with the Department’s victim services unit, the Department of State’s
Attorneys and Sheriffs victim advocates, and any operator of the State’s victim
notification system.
(d) Report. Annually, on or before July 1, the Department shall submit a
written report to the House Committee on Corrections and Institutions and the
Senate Committees on Institutions and on Judiciary detailing the following:
(1) security level assignments for persons under the custody of the
Commissioner, including all available demographic data;
(2) the numbers of inmates and offenders placed in any reentry facility
established pursuant to this section; and
(3) the transitional services provided to inmates and offenders pursuant
to subdivision (a)(2)(C) of this section.
Sec. 4. 28 V.S.A. § 701b is amended to read:
§ 701b. CLASSIFICATION OF PERSONS OR DEFENDANTS
(a) When a defendant or person in a civil or criminal action is sentenced to
the custody of the Commissioner or committed to the Commissioner’s custody
pending a prosecution on a misdemeanor criminal charge or for sentencing, the
Commissioner or the Commissioner’s designee shall within five days of
VT LEG #380894 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.436
2025 Page 6 of 12
sentencing or commitment, excluding weekends and holidays, classify the
person to determine whether he or she the person shall be incarcerated, held at
a community work camp, placed in a reentry facility, or furloughed. Failure to
classify within the five-day period shall not create a private right of action
against the State, its political subdivisions, or its employees.
(b) Notwithstanding 13 V.S.A. § 7554, the Commissioner may place on
furlough under provisions of section 808 of this title or in a reentry facility
pursuant to section 602 of this title, a misdemeanor defendant when the
Commissioner, based upon a completed classification, has determined that the
defendant is likely to appear in court as directed. If the Commissioner places
such a defendant on furlough or in a reentry facility, the Commissioner shall
impose not only the conditions of release initially ordered by the judicial
officer, but also such additional terms or conditions deemed necessary to
ensure that the defendant will appear in court. The Commissioner shall
supervise compliance with all such conditions imposed.
Sec. 5. 28 V.S.A. § 808 is amended to read:
§ 808. TEMPORARY FURLOUGHS GRANTED TO OFFENDERS
(a) The Department may extend the limits of the place of confinement of an
offender at any correctional facility or reentry facility if the offender agrees to
comply with such conditions of supervision the Department, in its sole
discretion, deems appropriate for that offender’s furlough. The Department
VT LEG #380894 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.436
2025 Page 7 of 12
may authorize a temporary furlough for a defined period for any of the
following reasons:
(1) to visit a critically ill relative;
(2) to attend the funeral of a relative;
(3) to obtain medical services;
(4) to contact prospective employers; or
(5) to secure a suitable residence for use upon discharge.
(b) An offender granted a temporary furlough pursuant to this section may
be accompanied by an employee of the Department, in the discretion of the
Commissioner, during the period of the offender’s furlough. The Department
may use electronic monitoring equipment such as global position monitoring,
automated voice recognition telephone equipment, and transdermal alcohol
monitoring equipment to enable more effective or efficient supervision of
individuals placed on furlough.
(c) The extension of the limits of the place of confinement authorized by
this section shall in no way be interpreted as a probation or parole of the
offender, but shall constitute solely a permitted extension of the limits of the
place of confinement for offenders committed to the custody of the
Commissioner.
(d) When any enforcement officer, as defined in 23 V.S.A. § 4; employee
of the Department; or correctional officer responsible for supervising an
VT LEG #380894 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.436
2025 Page 8 of 12
offender believes the offender is in violation of any verbal or written condition
of the temporary furlough, the officer or employee may immediately lodge the
offender at a correctional or reentry facility or orally or in writing deputize any
law enforcement officer or agency to arrest and lodge the offender at such a
correctional or reentry facility. The officer or employee shall subsequently
document the reason for taking such action.
(e) The Commissioner may place on medical furlough any offender who is
serving a sentence, including an offender who has not yet served the minimum
term of the sentence, who is diagnosed with a terminal or serious medical
condition so as to render the offender unlikely to be physically capable of
presenting a danger to society. The Commissioner shall develop a policy
regarding the application for, standards for eligibility of, and supervision of
persons on medical furlough. The offender may be released to a reentry
facility, hospital, hospice, other licensed inpatient facility, or other housing
accommodation deemed suitable by the Commissioner. As used in this
subsection, a “serious medical condition” does not mean a condition caused by
noncompliance with a medical treatment plan.
(f) [Repealed.]
(g) Subsection (b) of this section shall also apply to sections section 808a
and 808c of this title.
VT LEG #380894 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.436
2025 Page 9 of 12
Sec. 6. 28 V.S.A. § 808a is amended to read:
§ 808a. TREATMENT FURLOUGH
(a) An offender may be sentenced to serve a term of imprisonment, but
placed by a court on treatment furlough to participate in such programs
administered by the Department at a reentry facility or in the community that
reduce the offender’s risk to reoffend or that provide reparation to the
community in the form of supervised work activities.
(b) Provided the approval of the sentencing judge, if available, otherwise a
Superior Court judge, is first obtained, the Department may place on treatment
furlough an offender who has not yet served the minimum term of the
sentence, who, in the Department’s determination, needs residential treatment
services not available in a correctional facility. The services may include
treatment for substance abuse or personal violence or any other condition that
the Department has determined should be addressed in order to reduce the
offender’s risk to reoffend or cause harm to himself or herself themselves or to
others in the facility. The offender shall be released only to a reentry facility
established pursuant to section 602 of this title or a hospital or residential
treatment facility that provides services to the general population. The State’s
share of the cost of placement in such a facility, net of any private or federal
participation, shall be paid pursuant to memoranda of agreement between and
within State agencies reflective of their shared responsibilities to maximize the
VT LEG #380894 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.436
2025 Page 10 of 12
efficient and effective use of State resources. In the event that a memorandum
of agreement cannot be reached, the Secretary of Administration shall make a
final determination as to the manner in which costs will be allocated.
(c) [Repealed.]
Sec. 7. 13 V.S.A. § 7554 is amended to read:
§ 7554. RELEASE PRIOR TO TRIAL
(a) Release; conditions of release. Any person charged with an offense,
other than a person held without bail under section 7553 or 7553a of this title,
shall at the person’s appearance before a judicial officer be ordered released
pending trial in accordance with this section.
(1) The defendant shall be ordered released on personal recognizance or
upon the execution of an unsecured appearance bond in an amount specified by
the judicial officer unless the judicial officer determines that such a release will
not reasonably mitigate the risk of flight from prosecution as required. In
determining whether the defendant presents a risk of flight from prosecution,
the judicial officer shall consider, in addition to any other factors, the
seriousness of the offense charged; the number of offenses with which the
person is charged; whether, at the time of the current offense or arrest, the
defendant was released on conditions or personal recognizance, on probation,
furlough, parole, or other release pending trial, sentencing, appeal, or
completion of a sentence for an offense under federal or state law; and
VT LEG #380894 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.436
2025 Page 11 of 12
whether, in connection with a criminal prosecution, the defendant is compliant
with court orders or has failed to appear at a court hearing. If the judicial
officer determines that the defendant presents a risk of flight from prosecution,
the officer shall, either in lieu of or in addition to the methods of release in this
section, impose the least restrictive of the following conditions or the least
restrictive combination of the following conditions that will reasonably
mitigate the risk of flight of the defendant as required:
* * *
(I) Place the defendant in the home detention program pursuant to
section 7554b of this title.
(J) Place the defendant in a reentry facility pursuant to 28 V.S.A.
§ 602.
(2) If the judicial officer determines that conditions of release imposed
to mitigate the risk of flight will not reasonably protect the public, the judicial
officer may impose, in addition, the least restrictive of the following conditions
or the least restrictive combination of the following conditions that will
reasonably ensure protection of the public:
* * *
(H) Place the defendant in the home detention program pursuant to
section 7554b of this title.
VT LEG #380894 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.436
2025 Page 12 of 12
(I) Place the defendant in a reentry facility pursuant to 28 V.S.A.
§ 602.
* * *
Sec. 8. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS; REENTRY FACILITY;
DEVELOPMENT; REPORT
On or before January 15, 2026, the Department of Corrections shall submit
a written report to the House Committee on Corrections and Institutions and
the Senate Committees on Institutions and on Judiciary detailing the following:
(1) any plans to establish a reentry facility at a standalone location or at
an existing correctional facility;
(2) current or projected housing needs for inmates and offenders under
the custody of the Commissioner; and
(3) any current or prospective local, State, or federal partnerships to
facilitate and enhance the Department’s current and future reentry efforts.
Sec. 9. EFFECTIVE DATES
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2030, except that Sec. 8 (Department of
Corrections; reentry facility; development; report) shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380894 v.1